Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [15.442] LOCAL NEWS ORGANIZATION ADVERTISING BY STATE AGENCIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Advertising" means providing consideration for the publication, dissemination, solicitation, or circulation of visual, oral, or written communication to either: new text end new text begin (1) directly induce any person to utilize or participate in a service offered by an agency; or new text end new text begin (2) make any person aware of information relevant to an agency or a program or public awareness campaign operated by an agency. new text end new text begin (c) "Agency" means any state officer, employee, board, commission, authority, department, entity, or organization of the executive branch of state government. Agency does not include the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities. new text end new text begin (d) "Local news organization" means a print, digital, or hybrid publication, or a broadcast or radio station, that: new text end new text begin (1) primarily serves the needs of the state of Minnesota or a regional, local, or ethnic community within Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) primarily has content derived from primary sources relating to news and current events; new text end new text begin (3) employs at least one journalist who resides in Minnesota and who regularly gathers, collects, photographs, records, writes, or reports news or information that concerns local events or other matters of local public interest; and new text end new text begin (4) has a known Minnesota-based office of publication or broadcast where business is transacted during usual business hours with a local telephone number and must list contact information in each updated publication. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin State agency advertising. new text end new text begin Beginning July 1, 2025, at least 50 percent of an agency's expenditures on advertising must be made through local news organizations, with an emphasis on local newspapers where practicable. Advertising primarily targeted at out-of-state residents is not subject to this requirement. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin By February 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, all agencies must publish an annual report that includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) the total advertising spending by the agency; new text end new text begin (2) the total percentage of advertising spending through local news organizations; new text end new text begin (3) the total percentage of advertising spending through local newspapers; and new text end new text begin (4) the recipients of the advertising spending. new text end new text begin These reports may be published separately by each agency or as one report organized by agency. The reports must be publicly posted on agency websites and delivered to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government operations. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end